Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.080

Chapter applies to supreme and superior courts, court of appeals, and courts of limited jurisdiction.

This chapter shall apply to the following courts: The supreme court, the court of appeals, the superior courts; and, when and to the extent so ordered by the supreme court, to the courts of limited jurisdiction of this state, including district courts.

[ 1987 c 202 s 108; 1971 c 81 s 14; 1957 c 259 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.